Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 25 Execution And Revocation
28-25-106. Affidavit of attesting witness.

Any attesting witness to a will may make and sign an affidavit before any officer authorized to administer oaths in this state or in any other state stating such facts as he or she would be required to testify to in an uncontested probate proceeding concerning the will.

The attesting witness may make and sign the affidavit at any time, either:

On his or her own initiative;

At the request of the testator; or

After the testator's death, at the request of the executor or of any other person interested.

The affidavit shall be written on the will, or, if that is impracticable, it shall be securely affixed to the will or to a true copy of the will by the officer administering the oath.

If the probate of the will is uncontested, the affidavit may be accepted by the circuit court with the same effect as if the testimony of the witness had been taken before the court.

Ark. L. Rev.

Wills — Incorporation of Extrinsic Documents by Reference, 6 Ark. L. Rev. 496.

Note, Incorporation by Reference, Integration, and Holographic Wills in Gifford v. Estate of Gifford, 46 Ark. L. Rev. 1013.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Jans, Survey of Decedents' Estates, 3 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 216.

Testator's signed memoranda, made after execution of his will, can be effective with certain restrictions under this section; whether any such memoranda were left by the testator is for the trial court to decide if the issue was disputed. Deal v. Huddleston, 288 Ark. 96, 702 S.W.2d 404 (1986).

Memorandum in the handwriting of and signed by the testatrix was incorporated into her will by reference where it was physically attached and alluded to in the will. Gifford v. Estate of Gifford, 305 Ark. 46, 805 S.W.2d 71 (1991).

A signed handwritten note found in the decedent's jewelry box, which stated, “I want Vernita Ellison to have these items and [my dog],” was properly admitted as part of her will. Jones v. Ellison, 70 Ark. App. 162, 15 S.W.3d 710 (2000).

During the lifetime of the testator, the will shall be delivered only to him or her, or to some person authorized by him or her by an order in writing duly signed by him or her and acknowledged before an officer authorized to administer oaths or attested by the signatures of two (2) persons competent to witness the will.

After the testator's death, the clerk shall deliver the will to the person named in the endorsement on the wrapper of the will if that person requests the will either in person or in writing.

If the request under subdivision (c)(2) of this section is in person, the clerk shall require proof of identification before delivering the will.

If the request under subdivision (c)(2) of this section is in writing, the clerk shall require an affidavit of the person requesting the will in substantially the following form:

“STATE OF ARKANSAS

COUNTY OF ____________

BE IT KNOWN THAT on thisday of, ..., before me, the undersigned notary, personally came and appeared:

who after being duly sworn by me, a notary, deposed and stated his or her name and address.

SUBSCRIBED AND SWORN TO BEFORE ME THIS DAY OF,

NOTARY PUBLIC”

Amendments. The 2007 amendment substituted “The wrapper shall also be endorsed” for “The wrapper may also be endorsed” in (b); and, in (c), rewrote (2) and added (3) and (4).

The failure of the clerk or the parties to comply with all the provisions of this section in handling the will will not necessarily destroy its integrity. Wargo v. Wargo, 226 Ark. 42, 287 S.W.2d 882 (1956).

There was sufficient evidence to establish the validity of a will notwithstanding the fact that all the provisions of this section were not complied with. Wargo v. Wargo, 226 Ark. 42, 287 S.W.2d 882 (1956).

Ark. L. Notes.

Lonnie Beard, Questioning the practice of executing duplicate original wills, 2013 Ark. L. Notes 1030.

Ark. L. Rev.

Wills — Dependent Relative Revocation, 8 Ark. L. Rev. 193.

Wills — Revocation Implied from Divorce of Testator, 9 Ark. L. Rev. 182.

Leflar, Liberty and Death: Advance Health Care Directives and the Law of Arkansas, 39 Ark. L. Rev. 375.

Recent Development: Arkansas Probate Law — Revocation of Holographic Wills, 60 Ark. L. Rev. 1023.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Jans, Survey of Decedents' Estates, 3 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 216.

Note, Decedents' Estates — Wills — Doctrine of Dependent Relative Revocation — May Not Be Applicable in Arkansas, Larrick v. Larrick, 271 Ark. 120, 607 S.W.2d 92 (1980), 4 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 353.

Survey — Property, 11 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 243.

In order to effect revocation of a will other than by execution of another, the revocation must be in a manner prescribed by statute. Reiter v. Carroll, 210 Ark. 841, 198 S.W.2d 163 (1946) (decision under prior law).

There is no such thing as an irrevocable will. Allen v. First Nat'l Bank, 230 Ark. 201, 321 S.W.2d 750 (1959).

A testator did not successfully alter her will by retyping all dispositive provisions in her will and destroying the original provisions, since the altered instrument was not reexecuted and reattested to. Tull v. Benton State Bank, 257 Ark. 386, 516 S.W.2d 583 (1974).

Where the testator changed the disposition of her property in her typewritten will by interlineation or obliteration of a devisee's name, her attempt to obliterate the name of the devisee was void since it was not attested, and the devisee's name had to be restored to the will as originally intended. Dodson v. Walton, 268 Ark. 431, 597 S.W.2d 814 (1980).

The burden to prove revocation of a will rests on party asserting it. Cook v. Jeffett, 169 Ark. 62, 272 S.W. 873 (1925) (decision under prior law).

Former statute held not to relieve will contestants from proving the contents of a subsequent will by clear, positive, and satisfactory testimony in order to annul or revoke a former will. Reed v. Johnson, 200 Ark. 1075, 143 S.W.2d 32 (1940) (decision under prior law).

The finding of the circuit court, sitting as a jury, as to which is the later of two wills would not be disturbed unless there was a total want of evidence to support it, the dates to the wills not being conclusive. Austin v. Fielder, 40 Ark. 144 (1882) (decision under prior law).

Prior to enactment of this section, the only methods of revoking a will were those provided by statute, and a divorce and property settlement to former wife were not facts sufficient to revoke a will. Mosely v. Mosely, 217 Ark. 536, 231 S.W.2d 99, 18 A.L.R.2d 695 (1950) (decision under prior law).

The divorced wife of a testator who took her share of their marital property in the divorce proceeding was estopped from taking advantage of this implied revocation statute after the testator's death to obtain the bulk of her former husband's remaining property on the ground that the marriage was void. Rickner v. Estate of Rickner, 283 Ark. 42, 670 S.W.2d 450 (1984).

Will was not revoked by testator's marriage, but divorce did revoke will provisions made in spouse's favor. Davis v. Aringe, 292 Ark. 549, 731 S.W.2d 210 (1987).

Before a case can be made for equitable intervention, there must be proof that the testator undertook acts which would have resulted in legal revocation of the will had he not been prevented from the fulfillment of such acts by force or fraud. Reiter v. Carroll, 210 Ark. 841, 198 S.W.2d 163 (1946) (decision under prior law).

The clear meaning of the words used in this section is that any bequest to a former spouse is void but that the remainder of the will remains in effect. McGuire v. McGuire, 275 Ark. 432, 631 S.W.2d 12 (1982).

This section does not provide that its provision revoking a former spouse's bequest or devise upon divorce is dependent upon testator having made his will during a marriage. Davis v. Aringe, 292 Ark. 549, 731 S.W.2d 210 (1987).

Revocation of a holographic will that provided that the decedent's estate would pass to his former wife was appropriate under subsection (b) of this section because the parties'divorce occurred after the execution of the decedent's holographic will and his bequest was revoked by operation of law.Langston v. Langston, 371 Ark. 404, 266 S.W.3d 716 (2007), rehearing denied, — Ark. —, — S.W.3d —, 2007 Ark. LEXIS 663 (Dec. 6, 2007).

An unattested holographic will held not to revoke a prior attested will. Parker v. Hill, 85 Ark. 363, 108 S.W. 208 (1908) (decision under prior law).

Where a holographic will, when found, had the word “void” written at the top of each page and cross marks through the provisions of each page and the testimony of witnesses disagreed as to whether the word “void” and the cross marks were in the testator's handwriting, finding of the probate court that the will had been intentionally and effectively revoked by the testator was not against the preponderance of the evidence. Starnes v. Andre, 243 Ark. 712, 421 S.W.2d 616 (1967).

Trial court clearly erred in finding that a note an executrix found was an effective change of a decedent's individual retirement account beneficiary because if the note was regarded as a holographic will, it was revoked by the express terms of the decedent's will and by operation of law pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) of this section.Nunnenman v. Estate of Grubbs, 2010 Ark. App. 75, 374 S.W.3d 75 (2010), rehearing denied, — Ark. App. —, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Ark. App. LEXIS 248 (Mar. 10, 2010), review denied, Nunnenman v. Grubbs, — Ark. —, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Ark. LEXIS 390 (Aug. 6, 2010).

Although this section permits revocation of all or part of a will by cancellation or obliteration by the testator with the intent and for the purpose of revoking the will, since the “strike outs” had the effect of increasing the estate, the attempted revocation was ineffective because it would have resulted in a new testamentary disposition without attestation. Walpole v. Lewis, 254 Ark. 89, 492 S.W.2d 410 (1973).

An instrument to revoke a will must be executed in conformity to statutory requirements. Newboles v. Newboles, 169 Ark. 282, 273 S.W. 1026 (1925); McPherson v. McKay, 207 Ark. 546, 181 S.W.2d 685 (1944) (decision under prior law).

A will cannot be revoked by a trust instrument under this section. Wells v. Estate of Wells, 325 Ark. 16, 922 S.W.2d 715 (1996).

Where the widow testified she observed the testator tear up his will and set fire to it about a week before his death and where a witness testified that the testator the day before his death stated that he tore up his old will, there was substantial evidence to support the probate court's finding that the testator intentionally destroyed his will. Larrick v. Larrick, 271 Ark. 120, 607 S.W.2d 92 (1980).

Testator's will was not revoked pursuant to the terms of this section where the will was not destroyed in the testator's presence. In re Estate of O'Donnell, 304 Ark. 460, 803 S.W.2d 530 (1991), overruled in part, Edmundson v. Estate of Fountain, 358 Ark. 302, 189 S.W.3d 427 (2004), overruled, Minton v. Minton, 2010 Ark. App. 310, 374 S.W.3d 818 (2010).

Decedent's acts of marking “void” over each paragraph of his will, writing “bastard” and “get nothing” on the will, applying Liquid Paper over the names of the beneficiaries, and then shredding the document in the presence of his insurance agents, were sufficient to revoke the will under subdivision (a)(2) of this section. The proponents of the will failed to show that the decedent suffered from insane delusions at the time of the revocation.Heirs of Goza v. Estate of Potts, 2010 Ark. App. 149, 374 S.W.3d 132 (2010), rehearing denied, — Ark. App. —, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Ark. App. LEXIS 288 (Mar. 31, 2010).

Where a 1973 will was effectively revoked by execution of a 1976 will, in accordance with this section, and the 1976 will was destroyed, the decedent died intestate. Parker v. Mobley, 264 Ark. 805, 577 S.W.2d 583 (1979).

A testator's marriage after execution of a will did not operate to revoke his will. Lamb v. Ford, 239 Ark. 339, 389 S.W.2d 419 (1965).

A will was not revoked by cross-throughs, interlineations, and mark-outs made by the testator where the changes made by the testator were of no legal significance and evidence did not show that she intended to revoke her will by obliteration. Dillard v. Nix, 345 Ark. 215, 45 S.W.3d 359 (2001).

Oral instructions by the testator that his will be destroyed were insufficient, even though the testator believed his instructions had been carried out. Reiter v. Carroll, 210 Ark. 841, 198 S.W.2d 163 (1946) (decision under prior law).

Where will executed prior to marriage did not provide for widow, widow's right to take against the will was personal to her and did not survive when she died before making election to so take against will. Lamb v. Ford, 239 Ark. 339, 389 S.W.2d 419 (1965).

Where a husband executed a will giving all of his property to his wife with his stepchildren as the residual legatees and subsequently the parties were divorced, but the will was not changed, the bequest to his former spouse was thereby revoked in accordance with this section and the stepchildren were the proper parties to receive the property under the terms of the will. McGuire v. McGuire, 275 Ark. 432, 631 S.W.2d 12 (1982).

Residuary bequest to the decedent's stepchildren in the decedent's last will and testament was voided because the decedent's spouse, who was removed from the will pursuant to an antenuptial agreement, did not predecease the decedent by 30 days so that the condition precedent in the will that would have allowed the stepchildren to inherit under the terms of the will was not met. Further, the circuit court's determination that the antenuptial agreement did not cancel the entirety of the decedent's will was not clearly erroneous.Craig v. Craig, 2018 Ark. App. 489, 563 S.W.3d 560 (2018).

Under this section, any bequest to a former spouse is void, but the remainder of the will remains in effect; and unless the will is completely revoked because all of its substantive provisions favor the decedent's former spouse, the decedent will have died testate and §28-39-401 will apply. This section does not require a holding that §28-39-401 was not intended to be applied when the will predates a marriage. In re Estate of Epperson, 284 Ark. 35, 679 S.W.2d 792 (1984), cert. denied, Epperson v. Estate of Epperson, 471 U.S. 1017, 105 S. Ct. 2022 (1985).

This section does not make a distinction concerning wills that predate a marriage and those made after a marriage. Davis v. Aringe, 292 Ark. 549, 731 S.W.2d 210 (1987).

Cited: Mosely v. Mosely, 217 Ark. 536, 231 S.W.2d 99, 18 A.L.R.2d 695 (1950); Remington v. Roberson, 81 Ark. App. 36, 98 S.W.3d 44 (2003).

History.

Acts 1955, No. 106, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-417.

28-25-107. Incorporation of writing by reference.

Any writing in existence when a will is executed may be incorporated by reference if the language of the will manifests this intent and describes the writing sufficiently to permit its identification.

(1)Whether or not the provisions relating to holographic wills apply, a will may refer to a written statement or list to dispose of items of tangible personal property not otherwise specifically disposed of by the will, other than money, evidences of indebtedness, documents of title, securities, and property used in trade or business.

To be admissible under this subsection as evidence of the intended disposition, the writing must either be in the handwriting of the testator or be signed by him or her and must describe the items and devisees with reasonable certainty.

The writing may be:

Referred to as one to be in existence at the time of the testator's death;

Prepared before or after the execution of the will;

Altered by the testator after its preparation; and

A writing which has no significance apart from its effect upon the dispositions made by the will.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 814, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 60-418, 60-419.

28-25-108. Deposit of will with court in testator's lifetime — Disposition.

Deposit of Will.A will may be deposited by the person making it, or by some person for him or her, with the circuit court of the county of his or her residence, to be safely kept until delivered or disposed of as provided in this section. On being paid the fee of two dollars ($2.00), the clerk of the court shall receive and keep the will and give a certificate of deposit for it.

How Enclosed.Every will intended to be deposited as provided in subsection (a) of this section shall be enclosed in a sealed wrapper, which shall have endorsed thereon “Will of,” followed by the name of the testator. The clerk of the court shall endorse thereon the day when and the person by whom it was delivered. The wrapper shall also be endorsed with the name of the person to whom the will is to be delivered after the death of the testator. It shall not be opened or read until delivered to a person entitled to receive it, or otherwise disposed of as provided in this section.

(c)

To Whom Delivered.

(d)

When Will to Be Opened.

If the will is not delivered to a person named in the endorsement on the wrapper, it shall be publicly opened in the court within thirty (30) days after notice of the testator's death, and be retained by the court until offered for probate.

Notice shall be given to the executor, if any, named therein and to such other persons as the court may designate.

If the proper venue is in another court, the will shall be transmitted to that court, but, before such a transmission, a true copy shall be made and retained in the court in which the will was deposited.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 31; 1983, No. 898, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 22-523, 60-415; Acts 2007, No. 652, § 1.

28-25-109. Revocation of wills.

A will or any part thereof is revoked:

By a subsequent will which revokes the prior will or part expressly or by inconsistency; or

By being burned, torn, cancelled, obliterated, or destroyed, with the intent and for the purpose of revoking it by the testator or by another person in the testator's presence and by the testator's direction.

If, after making a will, the testator is divorced or the marriage of the testator is annulled, all provisions in the will in favor of the testator's spouse so divorced are revoked. With these exceptions, no will or any part thereof shall be revoked by any change in the circumstances, condition, or marital status of the testator, subject, however, to the provisions of §28-39-401.

When there has been a partial revocation, reattestation of the remainder of the will shall not be required.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, §§ 22, 23; 1979, No. 814, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 60-406, 60-407.

Former Spouses.

28-25-110. Revival of revoked or invalid will.

No will or any part thereof which shall be revoked, or which shall be or become invalid, can be revived otherwise than by a reexecution thereof, or by the execution of another will in which the revoked or invalid will or part thereof is incorporated by reference.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 24; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-408.